isv_lat_hunspell_dict.dic
opisati/AA
nikto/AC
težky/AD
veliky/AE
avstrija/AJ
procitovati/AH
pisati/AA
inokto/AC
naslědok/AK
muzika/AB
kusok/AK
libija/AJ
limitovati/AH
luka/AB
malpica/AL
želězo/AG
pěsok/AK
spaliti/AI
džordžija/AJ
vladěti/AF
planeta/AB
členok/AK
planovati/AH
ponedělok/AK
zapolniti/AI
demonstracija/AL
učestničstvo/AG
procedura/AB
konfiskovati/AH
měrjenje/AM
ovplyvniti/AI
napisati/AA
iskra/AB
razměšati/AF
rosija/AJ
početok/AK
rabstvo/AG
napolniti/AI
stranica/AL
dobytok/AK
strahovati/AH
proslaviti/AI
reforma/AB
vtorok/AK
elizija/AJ
statuja/AL
stěna/AB
strahovanje/AM
testovati/AH
mělky/AD
zloupotrěbiti/AI
pričinjati/AF
tenky/AD
zaměna/AB
izbudovati/AH
hristijanstvo/AG
biologija/AJ
buriti/AI
vsekto/AC
komora/AB
molčati/AF
ložica/AL
ostatok/AK
odnošenje/AM
igla/AB
putovati/AH
klok/AK
srbija/AJ
cěliti/AI
česati/AA
razděljati/AF
bezdna/AB
porno/AG
gorky/AD
baviti/AI
vugrija/AJ
diskusija/AL
vlada/AB
hrvatija/AJ
masturbovati/AH
lěvica/AL
napruženje/AM
narušati/AF
belgija/AJ
hvaliti/AI
spisok/AK
bojkotovati/AH
renesansa/AB
japonija/AJ
obsvětliti/AI
podpisati/AA
poredok/AK
prěadresovati/AH
dobyvati/AF
zadovoljstvo/AG
vstupiti/AI
ideja/AL
izměnjenje/AM
kopirovati/AH
jezda/AB
ekspansija/AJ
odstavati/AF
rěčenje/AM
dostatok/AK
usposobiti/AI
atakovati/AH
krěpky/AD
někto/AC
dozrěti/AF
opalok/AK
kaprizovati/AH
perspektiva/AB
zanečiščenje/AM
hlapstvo/AG
arheologija/AJ
krvaviti/AI
popravjati/AF
akademija/AL
povratok/AK
slovjanstvo/AG
makedonija/AJ
zapytanje/AM
dětinstvo/AG
reformovati/AH
okeanija/AJ
anulacija/AL
nacionalizovati/AH
stimulacija/AL
interpretovati/AH
surabotničstvo/AG
naměriti/AI
posrědničstvo/AG
guma/AB
cenzurovati/AH
goltati/AF
substancija/AL
vozlětati/AF
spisati/AA
zapisati/AA
prěpisati/AA
blagoslavjati/AF
razstaviti/AI
eksploatacija/AJ
svistok/AK
sprotivjenje/AM
šokovati/AH
ulomok/AK
lěsok/AK
maroko/AG
vozpominati/AF
tunizija/AJ
narodobijstvo/AG
galisija/AJ
duhovenstvo/AG
vpisati/AA
potvrdženje/AM
sankcija/AL
poznati/AF
goltok/AK
govedina/AB
izmysliti/AI
jedinstvo/AG
kodovati/AH
ljubovnica/AL
madjarija/AJ
malenjky/AD
narěčje/AM
obstajati/AF
odsutstvo/AG
otrudnjenje/AM
podkupiti/AI
poslětrešenje/AM
prěprogramovati/AH
prěryvanje/AM
prijmati/AF
rasa/AB
rabotničstvo/AG
rodženje/AM
spokojstvo/AG
svetok/AK
učestnica/AL
uvodniti/AI
večerjati/AF
vinobranje/AM
voditeljstvo/AG
članok/AK
požiranje/AM
rěpa/AB
surfovati/AH
uzdravjati/AF
odstupiti/AI
pisati/AA
součestnica/AL
prětečenje/AM
zemjedělstvo/AG
prěrazkazyvati/AF
edukacija/AJ
latinica/AL
bogoslužba/AB
bulgarizacija/AJ
gybky/AD
godovati/AH
hudožnica/AL
imutok/AK
izmirati/AF
izmysljenje/AM
ljudojedstvo/AG
mamiti/AI
odrubati/AF
pobudženje/AM
poslědica/AL
prěstupok/AK
pripisati/AA
prisposobjati/AF
prisposobjenje/AM
pupok/AK
rana/AB
razrazniti/AI
snědati/AF
sofija/AJ
ustrojstvo/AG
žaljenje/AM
žarky/AD
liberalizacija/AL
adoptovati/AH
aglutinacija/AJ
jednoženstvo/AG
krivoprisežničstvo/AG
nekonsistencija/AL
odkloniti/AI
ornitologija/AJ
prědsudok/AK
različenje/AM
slučati/AF
studiovati/AH
taktika/AB
smotriti/AI
razpetje/AM
kariera/AB
obrabotyvati/AF
osadok/AK
reputacija/AL
rukodělstvo/AG
staviti/AI
sustradanje/AM
navědžati/AF
pověriti/AI
bolivija/AJ
meksiko/AG
etiopija/AJ
zvanje/AM
prěžitok/AK
ljudožerstvo/AG
pritegati/AF
analogija/AL
lěpky/AD
klejky/AD
homogenizovati/AH
uvertura/AB
antropologija/AJ
džudo/AG
sociologija/AJ
telekomunikacija/AL
utěšenje/AM
zapaliti/AI
smutok/AK
zolva/AB
agronomija/AJ
aktivovati/AH
avtobiografija/AL
bakteriologija/AJ
bělok/AK
bordo/AG
degenerovati/AH
doganjati/AF
družica/AL
evrazija/AJ
fonema/AB
iglica/AL
vozglavje/AM
izgubiti/AI
jarky/AD
jesetrina/AB
kamenovati/AH
krěhky/AD
lajno/AG
ljvica/AL
loboda/AB
lupiti/AI
monako/AG
načetok/AK
nalivati/AF
oddaljenje/AM
odpiliti/AI
odpisati/AA
odrězok/AK
ogrěvati/AF
ogurok/AK
ostroga/AB
otravjenje/AM
ozdobiti/AI
razčesati/AA
razparjati/AF
razščepiti/AI
redukcija/AL
tonky/AD
uživanje/AM
ventilacija/AL
vika/AB
vulkanizovati/AH
zavitok/AK
lava/AB
sarajevo/AG
kaperstvo/AG
diskriminacija/AJ
razžigati/AF
soliti/AI
soljnica/AL
uniščenje/AM
konserva/AB
měhurok/AK
masirovati/AH
razčuljati/AF
samohvalstvo/AG
oprazdnjati/AF
vozsiliti/AI
negybky/AD
šlifovati/AH
holera/AB
grnčarstvo/AG
parodija/AL
demografija/AJ
prědpisati/AA
ulučšenje/AM
generalizovati/AH
dieta/AB
adopcija/AL
holandija/AJ
propiti/AI
peticija/AL
inspirovati/AH
trvanje/AM
opakovyvati/AF
norma/AB
redok/AK
tesati/AA
amnezija/AL
postulovati/AH
grenlandija/AJ
iskanje/AM
oktava/AB
